Washington statutes.
RCW 16.49.055

Custom meat facilities—Conditions for preparation of inspected and uninspected meat.

Inspected and uninspected meat may only be prepared by a custom meat facility under the following conditions:

(1) Inspected meat and meat products prepared from inspected meat must be kept separated from uninspected meat and meat products prepared from uninspected meat to prevent inspected meat from coming into contact with uninspected meat.

(2) Preparation of inspected meat and uninspected meat must be done at different times.

(3) Equipment used in preparing uninspected meat or products prepared from uninspected meat must be cleaned and sanitized before being used to prepare inspected meat.

(4) Uninspected meat may be prepared only for the use of the owner, who must be a household user.

(5) Uninspected meat and meat products prepared from uninspected meat must be clearly marked and labeled "not for sale".

(6) Packages of uninspected meat may not be stored in a retail counter.

[ 2000 c 99 s 6; 1987 c 77 s 3; 1985 c 415 s 7; 1971 ex.s. c 98 s 3. Formerly RCW 16.49.610.]

NOTES:

Savings—1987 c 77: See note following RCW 16.49.015.